Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,159
Health care personnel and clinics; requirements.

(1) In assigning health care staff to the correctional facilities under the control of the department, the medical director shall ensure that each facility has at least one designated medical doctor on call at all times and that each facility housing more than five hundred inmates has at least one full-time medical doctor assigned to that facility as his or her primary employment location.

(2) The medical director shall establish an acute care clinic in each of the correctional facilities and ensure that each clinic is staffed by at least one medical doctor, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse practicing under and in accordance with his or her respective certification act.

(3) The medical director shall establish chronic care clinics to provide health care services to inmates with chronic disease conditions, including diabetes and hypertension.

(4) The medical director shall establish a human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome chronic care clinic which shall provide for the relevant treatment, counseling, and education of inmates who are known to be infected with the human immunodeficiency virus.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 99.